Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-811
Dissolution.

A public library federation may, by a two-thirds majority vote of the library federation board, be dissolved after one year's notice. In the event of the dissolution of a public library federation, the participating local governing authorities shall determine the disposition of all federation assets on a prorated basis to affiliated public libraries.

Laws 1999, LB 362, § 11.